Washington statutes.
RCW 35.95.070

Purchase of leased public transportation system—Purchase price.

In the event the corporate authorities of any municipality during the term of a lease or any renewal thereof of a public transportation system desire to purchase the said system, the purchase price shall be no greater than the fair market value of the said system at the commencement of the lease.

[ 1965 ex.s. c 111 s 7.]

NOTES:

Authority to acquire and operate transportation facilities: RCW 35.92.060.